Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.071

Department of corrections—Certain personnel exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions provided under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply in the department of corrections to the secretary, the secretary's personal secretary, the deputy secretaries and their personal secretaries, all assistant deputy secretaries and their personal secretaries, all regional administrators and program administrators, all facility superintendents and associate superintendents for facilities with a resident capacity of fifty or more, and all management and sales staff of correctional industries.

[ 1999 c 122 s 1; 1989 c 185 s 1; 1983 c 175 s 1; 1981 c 136 s 28.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 136: See RCW 72.09.900.